Maryland, session 2025, HB0602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The State Board of Nursing shall hold discussions with the state nursing
licensing boards for Delaware, Pennsylvania, Virginia, West Virginia, and the District of
Columbia to pursue reciprocity agreements for advanced practice nursing licensure and
specialty certification.
(b) The Board shall prioritize collaboration with each specified jurisdiction to
facilitate the establishment of mutual and reciprocal licensure recognition arrangements
in order to:
(1) increase access to qualified advanced practice registered nurses;
(2) enhance licensure portability; and
(3) provide ease of telehealth access in the State and surrounding
jurisdictions.
(c) On or before November 1, 2025, and each November 1 thereafter for the next
4 years, the Board shall submit a report regarding the discussions required under
subsection (a) of this section to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, that includes:
(1) the status of reciprocity discussions with each specified jurisdiction;
(2) any agreements reached and the terms, if any;
(3) any challenges encountered during negotiations; and
– 1 –

Ch. 673 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes necessary to
facilitate reciprocity of nursing licenses.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –